Missouri, session 2026, HB2496.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 442, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 442.383, to read as follows:
442.383. 1. A person shall not file for record or have recorded in the office of the
county recorder of deeds an instrument conveying any real estate under a contract for
sale unless the instrument discloses the sales price of the real estate.
2. The purchaser of any real estate for which an instrument is recorded in
violation of subsection 1 of this section is liable to the state for a civil penalty for each
violation in an amount equal to five percent of the sales price of the real estate.
3. The attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the
real estate is located may bring suit to recover a penalty under this section.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to an instrument conveying only
a mineral interest in real estate.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.